California statutes. Education Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 4.4.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.6.

The missions of agencies charged with coordination, administration, or implementation of higher education policies and programs in California shall be as follows:

(a) The California Postsecondary Education Commission is the statewide postsecondary education coordinating and planning agency. The commission shall serve as a principal fiscal and program advisor to the Governor and the Legislature on postsecondary educational policy. Consistent with Section 66903, the commission’s responsibilities shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(1) Analysis and recommendations related to long-range planning for public postsecondary education.

(2) Analysis of state policy and programs involving the independent and private postsecondary educational sectors.

(3) Analysis and recommendations related to program and policy review.

(4) Resource analysis.

(5) Maintenance and publication of pertinent public information relating to all aspects of postsecondary education.

The commission shall consult with the postsecondary educational segments and with relevant state agencies, including the Student Aid Commission, the Superintendent of Public Instruction, and other relevant parties, in its preparation of analyses and recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature. However, the commission shall remain an independent and nonpartisan body responsible for providing an integrated and segmentally unbiased view for purposes of state policy formulation and evaluation.

(b) The California Student Aid Commission is the primary state agency for the administration of state-authorized student financial aid programs available to students attending all segments of postsecondary education. These programs include grant, work study, and loan programs supported by the state and the federal government.

Consistent with this responsibility, the Commission shall provide, in consultation with the postsecondary education segments and relevant state agencies, policy leadership on student financial aid issues, evaluate the effectiveness of its programs, conduct research and long-range planning as a foundation for program improvement, report on total state financial aid needs, and disseminate information to students and their families.

(c) The Council for Private Postsecondary and Vocational Education is the primary state agency responsible for approving and regulating private postsecondary and vocational educational institutions and for developing state policies for private postsecondary and vocational education in California. The council shall represent the private postsecondary and vocational education institutions in all state level planning and policy discussions about postsecondary and vocational education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1587, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.7.

(a) The Legislature, through the enactment of this section, expresses its commitment to encourage and support collaboration and coordination among all segments of education. 

(b) Within the differentiation of segmental functions outlined in this article, the institutions of higher education shall undertake intersegmental collaboration and coordination particularly when it can do any of the following: 

(1) Enhance the achievement of the institutional missions shared by the segments. 

(2) Provide more effective planning of postsecondary education on a statewide basis. 

(3) Facilitate achievement of the goals of educational equity. 

(4) Enable public and independent higher education to meet more effectively the educational needs of a geographic region. 

(5) Facilitate student progress from one segment to another, particularly with regard to preparation of students for higher education as well as the transfer from the California Community Colleges to four-year institutions.

(c) The leaders responsible for public and independent institutions of higher education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall work together to promote and facilitate the development of intersegmental programs and other cooperative efforts aimed at improving the progress of students through the educational systems and at strengthening the teaching profession at all levels. 

(d) The California Postsecondary Education Commission shall have responsibility for reviewing and evaluating the effectiveness of intersegmental activities in accomplishing the established goals, and shall report its findings to the Governor and Legislature biennially.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. State Goals For California’s Postsecondary Education System [66010.9. - 66010.95.]

66010.9.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Since the enactment of the Master Plan for Higher Education in 1960, California’s system of postsecondary education has provided access and high-quality educational opportunities that have fueled California’s economic growth and promoted social mobility.

(b) In today’s global information economy, California’s national and international
 success as an educational and economic leader will require strategic investments in, and improved management of, state educational resources.

(c) Several factors, including changing demographics, rising costs, increased competition for scarce state funding, and employer concerns about graduates’ skills, present new challenges to higher education and state policymakers in effectively meeting the postsecondary education needs of Californians.

(d) Although the public segments of postsecondary education have each undertaken efforts to improve reporting and transparency, these efforts do not combine to indicate whether the postsecondary system as a whole is on track to meet the state’s needs.

(e) The absence of a common vision and common goals for California’s postsecondary education system hinders the state’s ability to effectively make critical fiscal and policy decisions.

(f) Policy and educational leaders should collectively hold themselves accountable for meeting the state’s civic and workforce needs, for ensuring the efficient and responsible management of public resources, and for ensuring that California residents have the opportunity to successfully pursue and achieve their postsecondary educational goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (SB 195)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.91.

In order to promote the state’s competitive economic position and quality of civic life, it is necessary to increase the level of educational attainment of California’s adult population to meet the state’s civic and workforce needs. To achieve that objective, it is the intent of the Legislature that budget and policy decisions regarding postsecondary education generally adhere to all of the following goals:

(a) Improve student access and success, which shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, all of
 the following goals: greater participation by demographic groups, including low-income students, that have historically participated at lower rates, greater completion rates by all students, and improved outcomes for graduates.

(b) Better align degrees and credentials with the state’s economic, workforce, and civic needs.

(c) Ensure the effective and efficient use of resources in order to increase high-quality postsecondary educational outcomes and maintain affordability.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (SB 195)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.93.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that appropriate metrics be identified, defined, and formally adopted for the purpose of monitoring progress toward the achievement of the goals specified in Section 66010.91.
 It is further the intent of the Legislature that all of the following occur:

(1) The metrics take into account the distinct missions of the different segments of postsecondary education.

(2) At least six, and no more than 12, metrics be developed that can be derived from publicly available data sources for purposes of periodically assessing the state’s progress toward meeting each of the goals specified in Section 66010.91.

(3) The metrics be disaggregated and reported by gender, race or ethnicity, income, age group, and full-time or part-time enrollment
 status, where appropriate and applicable.

(4) The metrics be used for purposes of the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 69433.2.

(5) The metrics take into account the performance measures required to be reported pursuant to Sections 89295 and 92675.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to promote progress on the statewide educational and economic policy goals specified in Section 66010.91 through budget and policy decisions regarding postsecondary education. It is the intent of the Legislature that the metrics be used to ensure the
 effective and efficient use of state resources available to postsecondary education. It is further the intent of the Legislature that progress on the adopted metrics be reported and considered as part of the annual State Budget process.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (SB 195)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.95.

For the purposes of this chapter, “segments of postsecondary education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, independent institutions of higher education, as defined in Section 66010, and private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 367, Sec. 1.   (SB 195)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.6. Awards for Innovation in Higher Education Program [66010.96. - 66010.97.]

66010.96.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Awards for Innovation in Higher Education Program.

(b) The Awards for Innovation in Higher Education Program is hereby established to award funds appropriated for the program.

(c) The Committee on Awards for Innovation in Higher Education shall award funds appropriated for the program.

(d) The committee shall consist of the following members:

(1) The Director of Finance, or his or her designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the committee.

(2) Four members appointed by the Governor.

(3) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(4) One member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(e) The Department of Finance shall serve as staff to the committee.

(f) Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but the committee may reimburse members for necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of their duties.

(g) Actions taken to implement the provisions of this section by the Department of Finance, or the committee, shall not be subject to provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code.

(h) Any contract executed to implement the provisions of this section shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 10100) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, or Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(i) For purposes of Section 1090 of the Government Code, members of the committee shall not be deemed to be interested in any contract, including any award of funds by the committee, pursuant to this section.

(j) The committee shall develop administrative guidelines and other requirements for purposes of administering the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 14.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.97.

(a) The Committee on Awards for Innovation in Higher Education shall use funds appropriated in Item 6910-102-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2016 to make awards pursuant to this section.

(b) Moneys shall be awarded for innovations that reduce the time it takes students to complete degrees and credentials or reduce the total cost of attendance for students, or both, through any of the following:

(1) Redesign of curriculum and instruction, such as implementation of three-year degrees.

(2) Programs that allow students to make progress toward completion of degrees
 and credentials based on demonstration of knowledge and competencies, including military training, prior learning, and prior experiences.

(3) Programs that make financial aid more accessible, including by increasing the number of students who apply for financial aid, or that reduce the costs of books and supplies.

(c) The committee shall make an award only to a community college, but the award may be for innovations that encourage or require partnership between the community college and other entities.

(d) The committee shall give preference, when making awards, to innovations that do at least one of the following:

(1) Improve the outcomes described in subdivision (b) for students from groups that are underrepresented in higher education, such as
 low-income students, underrepresented minority students, first-generation students, students who are current or former foster youth, students with disabilities, and students who are veterans.

(2) Use technology in ways that are not common in higher education to improve the outcomes described in subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 24, Sec. 14.   (AB 1602)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.7. Chancellor’s Higher Education Innovation Awards Program [66010.98. - 66010.99.]

66010.98.

(a) This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the Chancellor’s Higher Education Innovation Awards Program.

(b) The Chancellor’s Higher Education Innovation Awards Program is hereby established to award funds appropriated for purposes of this article.

(c) The Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges shall make awards from the funds appropriated for purposes of this article, and the Chancellor’s Office of the California Community Colleges shall develop administrative guidelines and other requirements for administration of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 23, Sec. 2.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.99.

(a) The funds appropriated to the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges in Schedule 23 of Item 6870-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2017 are for allocation by the board of governors to make awards to community colleges pursuant to this article.

(b) The board of governors shall award moneys pursuant to this article for innovations that improve student success, and that are sustainable and capable of being scaled across the state, with a particular focus on all of the following:

(1) Programs and frameworks that support students from groups that are underrepresented in higher education, such as
 low-income students, students from underrepresented schools and
 neighborhoods, first-generation students, students who are current or former foster youth, and students with disabilities.

(2) Targeted services and programs for students who are current or former members of the Armed Forces of the United States. For the purposes of this section, “Armed Forces of the United States” means the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of each of those forces, the National Guard of any state, the California State Guard, and the California Naval Militia.

(3) Programs and frameworks that support adults who have been displaced from the workforce, and adults who are underemployed, so as to obtain the necessary training for gainful employment.

(4) Programs that support incarcerated adults in prisons and jails, including formerly incarcerated adults.

(5) Programs that incorporate technology to improve instruction and support services with a plan to ensure student success in these types of programs.

(c) The board of governors shall make an award pursuant to this article only to a community college, but the award may be for innovations that encourage or require partnership between the community college and other entities.

(d) (1) By January 1, 2020, the Chancellor’s Office shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature a summary of the activities supported by the moneys awarded.

(2) By January 1, 2022, the Chancellor’s Office shall report to the Director of Finance and the Legislature a summary of the outcomes for the student populations identified by the community colleges in their applications for an award, including, but not limited to, the number of degrees and certificates awarded and the time it took students to complete their program.

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 379, Sec. 4.   (AB 1715)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. General Provisions [66011. - 66027.83.]

66011.

(a) It is hereby declared to be the policy of the Legislature that all resident applicants to California institutions of public higher education, who are determined to be qualified by law or by admission standards established by the respective governing boards, should be admitted to either (1) a district of the California Community Colleges, in accordance with Section 76000, (2) the California State University, or (3) the University of California.

(b) As used in this part, “governing boards” means the local boards of trustees and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, the Trustees of the California State University, and the Regents of the University of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1372, Sec. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

66012.

It is hereby declared to be the intent of the Legislature that the fixed master plan approach in the development of public postsecondary education be replaced by a continuous planning process which includes:

(a) A legislative study of California postsecondary education at 10-year intervals to reevaluate the planning process and provide guidelines regarding goals, societal needs and general missions of public higher education and its components.

(b) Continuous planning by a state commission including a five-year plan which is to be updated annually.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66013.

Each segment of public higher education shall strive for excellence in its sphere, as assigned in this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.

The provisions of this part shall supersede the provisions of any other law which conflict with the provisions of this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.2.

(a) In order to help prospective students and their families more accurately calculate the cost of attendance, each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, post all of the following on its internet website, on or before February 1, 2020, and on or before February 1 each year thereafter:

(1) (A) Information about the market cost of one- and two-bedroom apartments and of one-person bedrooms in private houses in the areas surrounding that campus where its students commonly reside.

(B) In reporting this information, the campus shall exercise due diligence, and shall consult bona fide and reliable sources of
 current information about local housing market costs, including, but not necessarily limited to, information received from students of that campus, local newspapers and bulletin boards, and internet websites on which notices regarding local rental vacancies are posted. The information posted pursuant to this section shall be posted in the same location on the campus internet website where the housing cost estimates for off-campus students are posted.

(2) Separate estimates of other cost-of-living categories, on the same internet web page, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The estimated cost of living at home or in a permanent residence, such as with a parent.

(B) The estimated cost of food.

(C) The estimated cost of
 transportation.

(D) The estimated cost of books and supplies.

(E) The estimated cost of miscellaneous expenses.

(F) The estimated cost of tuition.

(G) The estimated cost of mandatory student fees.

(H) A description of the data sources and methods used to calculate its estimates for each cost of living category.

(3) A statement emphasizing both of the following:

(A) All cost estimates reflect estimated costs for a typical student, but actual costs can vary considerably for individual students.

(B) The university strongly encourages prospective students and their families to consider how their own costs might differ from those given in the estimates, including by seeking out cost of attendance estimates from other sources and by considering whether they will face other costs that are not listed in the estimate categories or how their veteran status might affect costs.

(b) Each campus of the California State University shall, and each campus of the University of California is requested to, post the information described in subdivision (a) on the same internet web pages where it is required to post cost estimates of institutional housing and meal plans pursuant to Section 69503.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 91.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.3.

(a) The California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, publicly provide labor market outcome information relating to the graduates of their undergraduate programs. The California State University and the University of California may publicly provide labor market outcome information relating to the graduates of their graduate programs. This information shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, salary data, and the percentage distribution of graduates, classified by industry.

(b) The information required by this section shall be provided using data including, but not necessarily limited to, information provided by the Employment Development Department
 pursuant to Section 1095 of the Unemployment Insurance Code and the segments’ own databases. The information shall be presented in accordance with all of the following requirements:

(1) The data shall be presented in terms of easily understood labor market measures, such as median annual wage.

(2) The data shall be aggregated to the systemwide level and by particular areas of study.

(3) Labor market outcome data for each category shall, at a minimum, provide data relating to graduates one or two years, and five years, after their graduation. The Legislature encourages the California State University and the University of California to additionally provide labor market outcome data for periods longer than five years after graduation.

(4) In the
 collection and publication of data pursuant to this section, the segments shall adhere to all pertinent state and federal privacy laws.

(c) The information required by this section shall be made publicly available through publication on the Internet Web sites of the respective segments, and shall be updated no later than June 1 of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 394, Sec. 2.   (SB 1022)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.4.

(a) For purposes of this section, “GI Bill educational benefits” means any educational benefit administered by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to Title 38 of the United States Code that is designed to help eligible veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States or other eligible persons with a relationship to a veteran of the Armed Forces of the United States to cover the costs associated with enrollment as a student.

(b) Commencing with the 2023–24 academic year, and annually thereafter for each academic year, the California State University shall, and the University of California is requested to, electronically transmit to the
 Department of Veterans Affairs, all of the following personal information regarding each student whose tuition or fees, or both, are paid, or intended to be paid, using GI Bill educational benefits, if the student has provided informed, written consent to the disclosure pursuant to subdivision (d):

(1) True, full name.

(2) Email address.

(3) Mailing address.

(4) Mobile telephone number.

(c) For purposes of subdivision (b), both of the following apply: 

(1) The first data transfer shall include all students using or intending to use GI Bill educational benefits for the 2023–24 academic year.

(2) Each annual data transfer after the first data transfer shall include only new students not identified in the prior data transfer who are using or intending to use GI Bill educational benefits for the academic year. 

(d) (1) On or before June 1, 2023, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, develop and post on its internet
 website a template for informed, written consent to be used by campus financial aid offices that permits a student, when applying for financial aid, to opt in to having the student’s personal information shared with the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to this section. 

(2) The informed, written consent shall be developed and administered in compliance with federal and state laws relating to individual privacy, including the requirements of the federal Family Education Rights
 and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-280, as amended) and applicable regulations, as these provisions may from time to time be amended.

(e) Information obtained by the Department of Veterans Affairs pursuant to this section shall be used only for purposes in furtherance of providing benefits and support services for veterans and shall not be used or disclosed for any other purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 174, Sec. 1.   (AB 1633)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to recognize the role of independent, regionally accredited postsecondary education in California postsecondary education. Statewide planning, policy coordination, and review of postsecondary education shall include attention to the contributions of the independent institutions in meeting the state’s goals of access, quality, educational equity, economic development, and student aid. 

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there is a need of providing students with economic and academic freedom of choice in selecting a college or university they wish to attend. The Legislature further finds that an important means of meeting this need is through offering financial assistance to students who wish to attend public or independent colleges and universities and who have demonstrated financial need.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.6.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, require each campus that provides campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing to post on its external and internal internet websites, at least twice each academic year, all of the following information:

(1) The number of enrolled students, and how many of those students are veterans.

(2) Existing campus housing stock, including, but not limited to, the number of available beds on campus.

(3) (A) The number of students on the campus housing waiting list, and how many of those students are veterans.

(B) The number of students that have removed themselves from the waiting list since the last report, and how many of those students are veterans.

(4) If available, the number of students who request campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing, and how many of those students are veterans.

(5) If available, the number of incoming freshmen, transfer students, and international students requiring campus-owned, campus-operated, or campus-affiliated student housing, and how many of those students are veterans.

(b) Data collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be collected by the
 department or center on campus that is tasked with providing on-campus and off-campus housing assistance to students.

(c) (1) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit, together with the information required pursuant to subparagraphs (B) and (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 17201, an annual report with the information described in subdivision (a) to the
 Legislature.

(2) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, submit one report that compiles all of the campus data collected pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) A report to be submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “veteran” has the same meaning as that term is defined in Section 980 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 3.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.7.

(a) The South County Higher Education Planning Task Force is hereby established for purposes of evaluating the feasibility of establishing a mixed-use intersegmental educational facility in the City of Chula Vista.

(b) (1) The task force shall be composed of the following members:

(A) At least one representative from San Diego State University appointed by the
 Chancellor of the California State University.

(B) At least one representative from Southwestern College appointed by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(C) At least one representative from the University of California, San Diego, appointed by the President of the University of California.

(D) At least one representative from the City of Chula Vista.

(E) At least one representative from the Sweetwater Union High School
 District.

(F) At least one public member appointed by the City of Chula Vista.

(G) At least one representative appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(H) At least one representative appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(2) All task force members shall be South County residents or individuals who work or have a vested interest in the area.

(3) The chair of the task force shall be voted on by a majority of the members.

(c) The task force established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall do at least all of the following:

(1) Identify and recommend potential governance structures for the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility, including, but not limited to, consortia and other collaborative models.

(2) Identify and analyze potential site locations and infrastructure requirements.

(3) Identify and recommend potential funding mechanisms, resources, and partnerships for the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility.

(4) Identify any statutory
 barriers to the recommendations developed pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, and
 recommend any statutory changes necessary for establishing the mixed-use intersegmental educational facility.

(5) Conduct public engagement activities for purposes of gathering regional input.

(6) Convene its first meeting on or before July 1, 2026.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of
 the Government Code, the task force established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before
 July 1, 2027.

(2) The report submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) (1) For purposes of this section, the task force may request and receive, but not require, information from the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges and the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the State Department of Education, any community college district, any local educational agency, the office of the Chancellor of the California State University, the office of the President of the University of California, or any organization representing independent institutions of higher education.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(f) The task force established pursuant to this section shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(g) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.   (AB 662)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

66014.8.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Institutional accreditation documents” means the institution’s institutional accreditation visiting team reports and the institutional accreditation agency action letters following an accreditation agency’s action relating to an initial accreditation, reaffirmation, comprehensive review, special visit, or any sanction or adverse action taken against an affiliated institution.

(2) “Segment of postsecondary education” means the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, the independent institutions of
 higher education, as defined in Section 66010, or the private postsecondary educational institutions, as defined in Section 94858.

(b) All campuses or other units of any segment of postsecondary education that receive public funding through state or federal financial aid programs, are institutionally accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education, and offer education and training programs to California students shall make final institutional accreditation documents available to the public, once those documents have been made final through an action of the accrediting agency, via display in a prominent location on the institution’s Internet Web site, with a link to these documents on the institutional Internet Web site homepage.

(c) A campus or other unit of any segment of postsecondary education whose documents are not currently
 available to the public shall make all institutional accreditation documents finalized by the accrediting agency based on reviews that take place after July 1, 2015, available to the public pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 388, Sec. 1.   (AB 2247)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.

It is the intent of the Governor and the Legislature, in cooperation with the Trustees of the California State University, to do both of the following:

(a) Place a major priority on resolving the serious problem of impacted and overcrowded classes, not only with respect to the California State University, but throughout public postsecondary education.

(b) Ensure that needy students receive financial aid sufficient to cover the cost of fee increases for each academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 31.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.1.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The 1986 Report on Lower Division Education at the University of California stated that “lower division (education) is something of a neglected child...” and suggested steps for improving the quality of teaching and academic support services.

(b) In 1991, the “Universitywide Task Force on Faculty Rewards Report” resulted in the adoption of policies to provide a greater emphasis on teaching. Policy revisions included broadening the range of evidence used in evaluation of teaching, peer review of teaching, and promotion policies that recognize great distinction in teaching as well as scholarship.

(c) In 1992, the University of California issued a number of “Presidential Initiatives to Protect and Improve Undergraduate Education.”

(d) The Legislature, in the Supplemental Report of the 1992 Budget Act, declared its intent that University of California faculty alter the distribution of their workload by:

(1) Increasing the number of courses and sections offered that are required for normal progress toward a baccalaureate degree.

(2) Increasing the number of freshman and sophomore seminars.

(3) Increasing opportunities for undergraduate research.

(4) Reducing the size of classes when desirable.

These measures were expected to result in an increase in the average teaching load of one additional course every one to three years.

(e) The report entitled “Initiatives to Improve Undergraduate Education,” prepared by the University of California in response to the 1992 Budget Act, is a commendable effort.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 776, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that quality classroom instruction be continually improved and that courses required for normal progress to a baccalaureate degree be provided in sufficient numbers.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature that where necessary the average teaching responsibilities of tenured and tenure track faculty be sufficiently increased to meet the goals described in this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 776, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

66015.7.

(a) In order to maintain and strengthen the high quality of international education in California, the Legislature encourages all public and private institutions of higher education to further develop, as their resources permit, programs that support learning about other cultures, global issues, and the exchange of Californians and international students and scholars.

(b) For California students and scholars, institutions are encouraged, as resources permit, to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Develop courses of study in as many fields as possible to increase students’ understanding of global issues and cultural differences.

(2) Offer courses in languages other than English to train students to communicate effectively in other cultures and to enhance their understanding of other nations’ values.

(3) Provide opportunities for students in all majors to participate in study abroad programs to enrich their academic training, perspectives, and personal development.
